dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX EL Y 10
SFX EL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EL i o/xPxBxO .
SFX EL i u/xPxE .
SFX EL i ev/xPxE .
SFX EL i e/xPxE .
SFX EL i ah/xPxE .
SFX EL i am/xPxE .
SFX EL i eju/xPxE .
SFX EL i ami/xPxE .
SFX EL i o/xPxE .

SFX EM Y 8
SFX EM 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EM i e/xPxBxO .
SFX EM i ego/xPxE .
SFX EM 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EM i em/xPxE .
SFX EM i emu/xPxE .
SFX EM 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EM 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX EN Y 12
SFX EN 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EN 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX EN yrovoz irovoz/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozy/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovoza/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozov/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozu/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozah/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozam/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozom/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovozami/xPxE .
SFX EN yrovoz irovoze/xPxE .

SFX EO Y 6
SFX EO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EO a e/xPxBxO .
SFX EO a 0 .
SFX EO 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EO 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EO 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX EP Y 6
SFX EP 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EP i e/xPxBxO .
SFX EP 0 j/xPxE .
SFX EP i ah/xPxE .
SFX EP i am/xPxE .
SFX EP i ami/xPxE .

SFX EQ Y 71
SFX EQ ti l .
SFX EQ ti la .
SFX EQ ti lo .
SFX EQ ti li .
SFX EQ asti u .
SFX EQ asti em .
SFX EQ asti eš .
SFX EQ asti e .
SFX EQ asti emo .
SFX EQ asti ete .
SFX EQ asti ut .
SFX EQ ti eh .
SFX EQ ti eše .
SFX EQ ti ehmo .
SFX EQ ti este .
SFX EQ ti ehu .
SFX EQ asti i .
SFX EQ asti imo .
SFX EQ asti ite .
SFX EQ asti uči .
SFX EQ asti učego .
SFX EQ asti učemu .
SFX EQ asti učim .
SFX EQ asti učem .
SFX EQ asti učih .
SFX EQ asti učimi .
SFX EQ asti uča .
SFX EQ asti uču .
SFX EQ asti učej .
SFX EQ asti učeju .
SFX EQ asti uče .
SFX EQ asti emy .
SFX EQ asti emogo .
SFX EQ asti emomu .
SFX EQ asti emym .
SFX EQ asti emom .
SFX EQ asti emo .
SFX EQ asti ema .
SFX EQ asti emu .
SFX EQ asti emoj .
SFX EQ asti emoju .
SFX EQ asti emi .
SFX EQ asti eme .
SFX EQ asti emyh .
SFX EQ asti emym .
SFX EQ asti emymi .
SFX EQ ti ši .
SFX EQ ti ša .
SFX EQ ti še .
SFX EQ ti eny .
SFX EQ ti enogo .
SFX EQ ti enomu .
SFX EQ ti enym .
SFX EQ ti enom .
SFX EQ ti eni .
SFX EQ ti ene .
SFX EQ ti enyh .
SFX EQ ti enymi .
SFX EQ ti ena .
SFX EQ ti enu .
SFX EQ ti enoj .
SFX EQ ti enoju .
SFX EQ ti eno .
SFX EQ ti enje/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enja/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enju/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enjem/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enij/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enjam/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enjami/xPxE .
SFX EQ ti enjah/xPxE .

SFX ER Y 12
SFX ER 0 0/xPxE .
SFX ER a o/xPxBxO .
SFX ER ina y/xPxE .
SFX ER a u/xPxE .
SFX ER a y/xPxE .
SFX ER ina 0 .
SFX ER a ě/xPxE .
SFX ER ina ah/xPxE .
SFX ER ina am/xPxE .
SFX ER a oju/xPxE .
SFX ER ina ami/xPxE .
SFX ER a o/xPxE .

SFX ES Y 80
SFX ES ti l .
SFX ES ti la .
SFX ES ti lo .
SFX ES ti li .
SFX ES cati ču .
SFX ES cati čem .
SFX ES cati češ .
SFX ES cati če .
SFX ES cati čemo .
SFX ES cati čete .
SFX ES cati čut .
SFX ES ti h .
SFX ES ti še .
SFX ES ti hmo .
SFX ES ti ste .
SFX ES ti hu .
SFX ES cati či .
SFX ES cati čimo .
SFX ES cati čite .
SFX ES cati čuči .
SFX ES cati čučego .
SFX ES cati čučemu .
SFX ES cati čučim .
SFX ES cati čučem .
SFX ES cati čučih .
SFX ES cati čučimi .
SFX ES cati čuča .
SFX ES cati čuču .
SFX ES cati čučej .
SFX ES cati čučeju .
SFX ES cati čuče .
SFX ES cati čemy .
SFX ES cati čemogo .
SFX ES cati čemomu .
SFX ES cati čemym .
SFX ES cati čemom .
SFX ES cati čemo .
SFX ES cati čema .
SFX ES cati čemu .
SFX ES cati čemoj .
SFX ES cati čemoju .
SFX ES cati čemi .
SFX ES cati čeme .
SFX ES cati čemyh .
SFX ES cati čemym .
SFX ES cati čemymi .
SFX ES ti vši .
SFX ES ti všego .
SFX ES ti všemu .
SFX ES ti všim .
SFX ES ti všem .
SFX ES ti vših .
SFX ES ti všimi .
SFX ES ti vša .
SFX ES ti všu .
SFX ES ti všej .
SFX ES ti všeju .
SFX ES ti vše .
SFX ES ti ny .
SFX ES ti nogo .
SFX ES ti nomu .
SFX ES ti nym .
SFX ES ti nom .
SFX ES ti ni .
SFX ES ti ne .
SFX ES ti nyh .
SFX ES ti nymi .
SFX ES ti na .
SFX ES ti nu .
SFX ES ti noj .
SFX ES ti noju .
SFX ES ti no .
SFX ES ti nje/xPxE .
SFX ES ti nja/xPxE .
SFX ES ti nju/xPxE .
SFX ES ti njem/xPxE .
SFX ES ti nij/xPxE .
SFX ES ti njam/xPxE .
SFX ES ti njami/xPxE .
SFX ES ti njah/xPxE .

SFX ET Y 99
SFX ET ti l .
SFX ET ti la .
SFX ET ti lo .
SFX ET ti li .
SFX ET ti ju .
SFX ET ti m .
SFX ET ti ješ .
SFX ET ti š .
SFX ET ti je .
SFX ET ti 0 .
SFX ET ti jemo .
SFX ET ti mo .
SFX ET ti jete .
SFX ET i e .
SFX ET ti jut .
SFX ET ti h .
SFX ET ti še .
SFX ET ti hmo .
SFX ET ti ste .
SFX ET ti hu .
SFX ET ti j .
SFX ET ti jmo .
SFX ET ti jte .
SFX ET ti juči .
SFX ET ti jučego .
SFX ET ti jučemu .
SFX ET ti jučim .
SFX ET ti jučem .
SFX ET ti jučih .
SFX ET ti jučimi .
SFX ET ti juča .
SFX ET ti juču .
SFX ET ti jučej .
SFX ET ti jučeju .
SFX ET ti juče .
SFX ET ti jemy .
SFX ET ti jemogo .
SFX ET ti jemomu .
SFX ET ti jemym .
SFX ET ti jemom .
SFX ET ti jemo .
SFX ET ti jema .
SFX ET ti jemu .
SFX ET ti jemoj .
SFX ET ti jemoju .
SFX ET ti jemi .
SFX ET ti jeme .
SFX ET ti jemyh .
SFX ET ti jemym .
SFX ET ti jemymi .
SFX ET ti my .
SFX ET ti mogo .
SFX ET ti momu .
SFX ET ti mym .
SFX ET ti mom .
SFX ET ti mo .
SFX ET ti ma .
SFX ET ti mu .
SFX ET ti moj .
SFX ET ti moju .
SFX ET ti mi .
SFX ET ti me .
SFX ET ti myh .
SFX ET ti mym .
SFX ET ti mymi .
SFX ET ti vši .
SFX ET ti všego .
SFX ET ti všemu .
SFX ET ti všim .
SFX ET ti všem .
SFX ET ti vših .
SFX ET ti všimi .
SFX ET ti vša .
SFX ET ti všu .
SFX ET ti všej .
SFX ET ti všeju .
SFX ET ti vše .
SFX ET ti eny .
SFX ET ti enogo .
SFX ET ti enomu .
SFX ET ti enym .
SFX ET ti enom .
SFX ET ti eni .
SFX ET ti ene .
SFX ET ti enyh .
SFX ET ti enymi .
SFX ET ti ena .
SFX ET ti enu .
SFX ET ti enoj .
SFX ET ti enoju .
SFX ET ti eno .
SFX ET ti enje/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enja/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enju/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enjem/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enij/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enjam/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enjami/xPxE .
SFX ET ti enjah/xPxE .

SFX EU Y 68
SFX EU sti dl .
SFX EU sti dla .
SFX EU sti dlo .
SFX EU sti dli .
SFX EU sti du .
SFX EU sti dem .
SFX EU sti deš .
SFX EU sti de .
SFX EU sti demo .
SFX EU sti dete .
SFX EU sti dut .
SFX EU sti deh .
SFX EU sti deše .
SFX EU sti dehmo .
SFX EU sti deste .
SFX EU sti dehu .
SFX EU sti di .
SFX EU sti dimo .
SFX EU sti dite .
SFX EU sti duči .
SFX EU sti dučego .
SFX EU sti dučemu .
SFX EU sti dučim .
SFX EU sti dučem .
SFX EU sti dučih .
SFX EU sti dučimi .
SFX EU sti dučaduče .
SFX EU sti dučuduče .
SFX EU sti dučejduče .
SFX EU sti dučejuduče .
SFX EU sti domy .
SFX EU sti domogo .
SFX EU sti domomu .
SFX EU sti domym .
SFX EU sti domom .
SFX EU sti domo .
SFX EU sti domadomo .
SFX EU sti domudomo .
SFX EU sti domojdomo .
SFX EU sti domojudomo .
SFX EU sti domidomo .
SFX EU sti domedomo .
SFX EU sti domyhdomo .
SFX EU sti domymdomo .
SFX EU sti domymidomo .
SFX EU sti dši .
SFX EU sti dšadše .
SFX EU sti deny .
SFX EU sti denogo .
SFX EU sti denomu .
SFX EU sti denym .
SFX EU sti denom .
SFX EU sti deni .
SFX EU sti dene .
SFX EU sti denyh .
SFX EU sti denymi .
SFX EU sti denadeno .
SFX EU sti denudeno .
SFX EU sti denojdeno .
SFX EU sti denojudeno .
SFX EU sti denje/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denja/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denju/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denjem/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denij/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denjam/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denjami/xPxE .
SFX EU sti denjah/xPxE .
