dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
kolibri/EL
putujuči/EM
pancyrovoz/EN
jajca/EO
oči/EP
uši/EP
pasti/EQ
danina/ER
klicati/ES
umyti/ET
sesti/EU
medija/EO
dějanja/EO
nastavjenja/EO
tkanina/ER
medvěd-grizli/EL
měšanina/ER
poni/EL
napasti/EQ
srdca/EO
věreči/EM
početkujuči/EM
lori/EL
prisposobjenja/EO
zombi/EL
